Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-295] Federal tax-exempt status. To
the extent practicable, special purpose revenue bonds issued pursuant to this
part shall be issued to comply with requirements imposed by applicable federal
law providing that the interest on the special purpose revenue bonds shall be
excluded from gross income for federal income tax purposes, except as certain
minimum taxes or environmental taxes may apply. The department may enter into
agreements, establish funds or accounts, and take any action required to comply
with applicable federal law. Nothing in this part shall be deemed to prohibit
the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds, the interest on which may be
included in gross income for federal income tax purposes. [L 2006, c 102, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next